Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-310.02
Special permits; fees; limitation.

The fees established by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to sections 48-310 and 48-310.01 shall be established with due regard for the costs of administering sections 48-310 and 48-310.01. The fees shall not exceed the amount necessary to meet the costs of administering sections 48-310 and 48-310.01.

Laws 1996, LB 1047, § 1.